Illinois, session 104th, HB4185.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Official Insignia and Uniform Sales Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Badge" has the meaning set forth in subsection (b) of 8Section 107-14 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963.9    "Counterfeit official insignia or uniform" means an item 10that so resembles an official insignia or uniform of a public 11employee that it would deceive an ordinary individual into 12believing it was an official insignia or uniform.13    "Official insignia or uniform" means an article of 14distinctive clothing or insignia, including a badge, emblem, 15or identification card, that indicates the authority of a 16public employee.17    "Public employee" means any officer or employee of a unit 18of federal, State, or local government.19    "Uniform" means distinctive clothing or other items of 20dress, whether real or counterfeit, worn during the 21performance of official duties and which identifies the wearer 22as a public employee. "Uniform" does not include casual 23apparel for public employees of the State or a unit of local   HB4185- 2 -LRB104 15736 SPS 28921 b1government that is distributed by the State or a unit of 2government for public support or fundraising efforts.  3    Section 10. Distribution of official insignia or uniforms. 4    (a) A person shall not:5        (1) knowingly manufacture, sell, market, promote, 6    advertise, or otherwise distribute any counterfeit 7    official insignia or uniform; or8        (2) knowingly manufacture, sell, market, promote, 9    advertise, or otherwise distribute any counterfeit 10    official insignia or uniform to an individual, knowing 11    that the individual is not authorized to possess it under 12    the law of the place in which the insignia or uniform is 13    the official insignia or uniform.14    (b) A person who violates this Section is guilty of a petty 15offense punishable by a fine not to exceed $500 for the first 16offense and a fine not to exceed $1,000 for a second or 17subsequent offense.  18    Section 15. Defenses.19    (a) It is a defense to prosecution under this Act that the 20insignia or uniform is other than a counterfeit official 21insignia or uniform and is not used to mislead or deceive and 22is used or is intended to be used exclusively:23        (1) as a memento or in a collection or exhibit;24        (2) for decorative purposes;  HB4185- 3 -LRB104 15736 SPS 28921 b1        (3) for a dramatic presentation, such as a theatrical, 2    film, or television production; or3        (4) for any other recreational purpose.4    (b) It is a defense to prosecution under this Act that the 5official insignia or uniform is not used or intended to be used 6to mislead or deceive or is a counterfeit official insignia or 7uniform and is used or is intended to be used exclusively:8        (1) for a dramatic presentation, such as a theatrical, 9    film, or television production;10        (2) for legitimate law enforcement purposes; or11        (3) for law enforcement retirement, such as previously 12    awarded badges.